Oklahoma, session 2026, HB1330.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE PEOPLE OF THE STATE OF OKLAHOMA:
SECTION 1. NEW LAW A new section of law to be codified
in the Oklahoma Statutes as Section 9-101 of Title 37A, unless there
is created a duplication in numbering, reads as follows:
A. There is hereby created the Task Force for the Study of
Oklahoma Alcoholic Beverage Laws.
B. The task force shall consist of thirteen (13) members who
own a business that holds an Alcoholic Beverages Laws Enforcement
Commission license as follows:
1. Three members to be appointed by the Governor;

Req. No. 10123 Page 1

2. Five members to be appointed by the Speaker of the Oklahoma
House of Representatives; and
3. Five members to be appointed by the President Pro Tempore of
the Oklahoma State Senate.
C. The task force shall conduct an organizational meeting not
later than one hundred and twenty (120) days after the sine die
adjournment of the 1st Regular Session of the 60th Oklahoma
Legislature.
D. The task force shall be authorized to meet as often as
required in order to perform the duties imposed upon the task force
by law.
E. The chair of the task force shall be elected by the members
of the task force. A simple majority of the members of the task
force shall constitute a quorum for purposes of any action taken by
the task force
F. 1. The task force shall conduct a study of Oklahoma
alcoholic beverage laws. The task force shall look at the
feasibility of and make recommendations for the following:
a. lowering fines and fees set by statute and by the
Alcoholic Beverage Laws Enforcement Commission;
b. reduce unnecessary state regulations in the alcoholic
beverage industry;


Req. No. 10123 Page 2

c. removing requirements that a holder of a license
issued by the Alcoholic Beverage Laws Enforcement
Commission must use one distributor;
d. allowing a holder of a license issued by the Alcoholic
Beverage Laws Enforcement Commission to choose
distributors;
e. prohibiting distributors from monopolizing one brand
or control or force a holder of a license issued by
the Alcoholic Beverage Laws Enforcement Commission to
solely use that distributor by controlling one brand
of product; and
f. allowing a holder of a license issued by the Alcoholic
Beverage Laws Enforcement Commission to maintain and
store records off license premises at a separate
location.
2. The task force shall produce a final report containing a
summary of its findings and recommendations with respect to such
issues. The final report, if approved by the task force, shall be
submitted to the Governor, the Speaker of the Oklahoma House of
Representatives and the President Pro Tempore of the Oklahoma State
Senate not later than December 31, 2025.
G. Travel reimbursement shall be the responsibility of the
appointing authority.

Req. No. 10123 Page 3

H. Staff assistance for the task force shall be provided by the
Oklahoma House of Representatives and the Oklahoma State Senate. To
the extent practical, the Alcoholic Beverages Laws Enforcement
Commission having information that would be helpful to the task
force shall provide such assistance and information to the task
force as may be required.
I. The task force shall be subject to the provisions of the
Oklahoma Open Meeting Act and the Oklahoma Open Records Act.
J. The task force shall cease to have any authority to take any
official action after January 31, 2025, and shall be dissolved by
operation of law on January 1, 2026.
SECTION 2. This act shall become effective October 1, 2025.

60-1-10123 JL 01/07/25










Req. No. 10123 Page 4